Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.090

Poultry shows—Petition—Appropriation.

Upon petition of twenty-five resident taxpayers of any county who are interested in the poultry industry, the board of county commissioners may set aside and include in its annual budget a sum equivalent to five percent of the assessed valuation of poultry in the county each year for the purpose of holding winter poultry shows, the said sum not to exceed five hundred dollars in any one year.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.090. Prior: 1929 c 109 s 1; RRS s 2755-1.]